Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 20.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201076-2237
Uniform Standards
of Professional Appraisal Practice; rules and regulations.

Each credential holder shall comply with the Uniform Standards
of Professional Appraisal Practice. The board shall adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations which conform to the Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal
Practice. The board shall review such rules and regulations annually. A copy
of each such rule or regulation shall be transmitted
electronically to each credential holder and shall be made available on the board's web site.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 37;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 41;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 38;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 29;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 59;

Laws 2007, LB186, § 21;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 20.
April 15, 2010